Florida, session 2026, SB1730.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 85 86 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 39.01, Florida 87 Statutes, is amended to read: 88 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 89 context otherwise requires: 90 (2)ââAbuseâ means any willful act or threatened act that 91 results in any physical, mental, or sexual abuse, injury, or 92 harm that causes or creates a substantial risk of significant 93 impairment to is likely to cause the childâs physical, mental, 94 or emotional health. The term includes any direct or indirect 95 action or omission that impacts the childâs well-being, 96 regardless of whether the child recognizes or understands that 97 the action or omission is abusive or whether the action or 98 omission results in actual injury; to be significantly impaired. 99 Abuse of a child includes the birth of a new child into a family 100 during the course of an open dependency case when the parent or 101 caregiver has been determined to lack the protective capacity to 102 safely care for the children in the home and has not 103 substantially complied with the case plan towards successful 104 reunification or met the conditions for return of the children 105 into the home; and any violation of s. 787.03, relating to 106 interference with custody. Whether a willful act or threatened 107 act is abuse depends upon the nature of the act or threat, 108 regardless of the outcome of the act or threat. Abuse of a child 109 includes acts or omissions. Corporal discipline of a child by a 110 parent or legal custodian for disciplinary purposes does not in 111 itself constitute abuse when it does not result in harm to the 112 child. 113 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 39.205, Florida 114 Statutes, is amended to read: 115 39.205âPenalties relating to reporting of child abuse, 116 abandonment, or neglect.â 117 (1)âA person who knowingly and willfully fails to report to 118 the central abuse hotline known or suspected child abuse, 119 abandonment, or neglect, or who knowingly and willfully prevents 120 another person from doing so, commits a felony of the third 121 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 122 775.084. A judge subject to discipline pursuant to s. 12, Art. V 123 of the State Constitution may not be subject to criminal 124 prosecution when the information was received in the course of 125 official duties. 126 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (14) of section 127 61.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 128 61.046âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 129 (14)ââParenting planâ means a document created to govern 130 the relationship between the parents relating to decisions that 131 must be made regarding the minor child and must contain a time 132 sharing schedule for the parents and child. The issues 133 concerning the minor child may include, but are not limited to, 134 the childâs education, health care, and physical, social, and 135 emotional well-being. In creating the plan, all circumstances 136 between the parents, including their historic relationship, 137 domestic violence, and other factors must be taken into 138 consideration. 139 (a)âThe parenting plan must be: 140 1.a.âBe developed and agreed to by the parents and approved 141 by a court; or 142 b.2.âBe established by the court, with or without the use 143 of a court-ordered parenting plan recommendation, if the parents 144 cannot agree to a plan or the parents agreed to a plan that is 145 not approved by the court; and 146 2.âInclude a statement that, in accordance with s. 787.03, 147 law enforcement officers shall investigate all reported 148 instances of interference with custody and are authorized to 149 locate the child, accompany a parent seeking to enforce lawful 150 custody or visitation rights, and assist a parent in enforcing 151 lawful custody or visitation rights. 152 Section 4.âSection 61.46, Florida Statutes, is created to 153 read: 154 61.46âEmergency hearings in custody and visitation 155 disputes.â 156 (1)âDEFINITION.âFor purposes of this section, the term 157 âemergency hearingâ means an expedited judicial proceeding to 158 address an urgent issue posing a threat of imminent or 159 irreparable harm to a child or vulnerable adult, including, but 160 not limited to, interference with lawful custody or visitation 161 as defined in s. 787.03, which proceeding is intended to provide 162 temporary relief pending a full adjudication of the issue on its 163 merits. 164 (2)âCRITERIA.â 165 (a)âAn interested party may file a motion with a court of 166 appropriate jurisdiction requesting an emergency hearing to 167 resolve a custody or visitation dispute that includes any of the 168 following circumstances: 169 1.âA verified violation of s. 741.28, s. 827.03, or s. 170 787.03 exists, creating a credible threat to the physical or 171 emotional well-being of a child or vulnerable adult. 172 2.âImmediate action is necessary to prevent significant 173 financial or custodial harm. 174 3.âA child or vulnerable adult has been unlawfully removed, 175 concealed, withheld, or relocated by a parent or caregiver in 176 violation of a court order, shared parenting plan, or applicable 177 law, where delay would endanger the childâs physical or 178 emotional well-being or substantially impair the parent-child 179 relationship. 180 4.âA child or vulnerable adult faces imminent abuse or harm 181 as defined in s. 39.01(2) and (37), respectively. 182 (b)âThe motion must include a sworn affidavit specifying 183 the alleged violation and urgent need for judicial intervention, 184 which provides: 185 1.âEvidence of a breached court order or parenting plan 186 concerning custody or visitation; or 187 2.âA description of the actions by the alleged offender 188 which interfere with established custody or visitation rights. 189 (3)âEMERGENCY HEARING.â 190 (a)âThe court shall immediately review motions received 191 pursuant to this section. If the court determines that any of 192 the circumstances listed in paragraph (2)(a) exist, the court 193 must hold an emergency hearing within 3 business days. 194 (b)âThe court shall give all parties to the emergency 195 hearing prompt notice of the time and place of the emergency 196 hearing. 197 (c)âDuring the emergency hearing, the court may issue 198 temporary orders to protect the child or vulnerable adult, 199 including, but not limited to, orders that do any of the 200 following: 201 1.âAdjust custody or visitation arrangements. 202 2.âDirect the prompt return of the child or vulnerable 203 adult to the lawful custodian. 204 3.âOrder law enforcement to enforce the orders of the 205 court, including, if necessary, supervised return. 206 (4)âFULL HEARING.âA full hearing on the merits must occur 207 within 30 calendar days after an emergency hearing to assess 208 allegations and establish long-term custody or visitation 209 arrangements. A temporary order issued during an emergency 210 hearing remains in effect until modified by order of the court 211 during a full hearing. 212 (5)âMAKEUP TIME AND ADDITIONAL REMEDIES.âIf the court finds 213 at a full hearing that a parent unreasonably refused to honor a 214 time-sharing agreement in the parenting plan, the court must do 215 all of the following: 216 (a)âAward sufficient makeup time to the parent whose 217 custodial time was denied, pursuant to s. 61.13(4)(c). 218 (b) Consider additional remedies and sanctions, including, 219 but not limited to, fines, community service, and supervised 220 visitation, to deter future violations and protect the integrity 221 of the court-ordered parenting plan or time-sharing agreement. 222 Section 5.âSubsection (2) of section 741.28, Florida 223 Statutes, is amended to read: 224 741.28âDomestic violence; definitions.âAs used in ss. 225 741.28-741.31: 226 (2)ââDomestic violenceâ means any assault, aggravated 227 assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, sexual 228 battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping as defined in 229 s. 787.01, false imprisonment as defined in s. 787.02, 230 interference with lawful custody or visitation as defined in s. 231 787.03, or any other criminal offense resulting in physical 232 injury or death of one family or household member by another 233 family or household member. The term includes interference with 234 lawful custody or visitation which occurs through the taking or 235 retaining by one family or household member of another family or 236 household member who is a minor or vulnerable adult before the 237 entry of a court order or agreed-upon parenting plan 238 establishing lawful custody or visitation. 239 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 787.01, Florida 240 Statutes, is amended to read: 241 787.01âKidnapping; kidnapping of child under age 13 or 242 vulnerable adult, aggravating circumstances.â 243 (1)(a)âThe term âkidnappingâ means forcibly, secretly, or 244 by threat confining, abducting, or imprisoning another person 245 against her or his will and without lawful authority, when such 246 conduct involves any of the following with intent to: 247 1.âHolding such person Hold for ransom or reward or as a 248 shield or hostage. 249 2.âCommitting or facilitating the Commit or facilitate 250 commission of any felony. 251 3.âInflicting Inflict bodily harm upon or terrorizing to 252 terrorize the victim or another person. 253 4.âInterfering Interfere with the performance of any 254 governmental or political function. 255 5.âInterfering with lawful custody or visitation as defined 256 in s. 787.03. 257 (b)âThe confinement, abduction, or imprisonment of a child 258 under the age of 13 or a vulnerable adult is against her or his 259 will within the meaning of this subsection if such confinement, 260 abduction, or imprisonment is without the consent of all of her 261 or his parents parent or legal guardians guardian. 262 Section 7.âSection 787.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 263 read: 264 (Substantial rewording of section. See 265 s. 787.03, F.S., for present text.) 266 787.03âInterference with lawful custody or visitation; 267 defenses; penalties.â 268 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that interference 269 with lawful custody or visitation be treated as a criminal act 270 rather than as a private matter. 271 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âlawful custody or 272 visitationâ means the rights of a parent or legal guardian to 273 the care, control, and companionship of a minor or vulnerable 274 adult, whether arising by statute, consistent with a court 275 order, or by operation of law, including the right to all of the 276 following: 277 (a)âCommunicate between the minor or vulnerable adult and 278 the other parent or legal guardian in person, by telephone, 279 text, video call, e-mail, or other electronic means without 280 interference. 281 (b)âHave physical access to the minor or vulnerable adult 282 during court-ordered or agreed-upon custody or visitation 283 periods without denial or limitation. 284 (c)âParticipate in timely custody exchanges, visitation, or 285 parenting time without delay or absence, except when reasonable 286 notice or a verifiable lawful excuse exists. 287 (d)âBe free from allegations of abuse, neglect, or other 288 misconduct which are unfounded, unsubstantiated, or without 289 probable cause, and which have the effect of disrupting, 290 delaying, or otherwise undermining the lawful custody or 291 visitation of a parent or legal guardian. 292 (3)âThe right of each parent or legal guardian to lawful 293 custody or visitation may not be infringed without due process 294 and a valid court order expressly removing or restricting such 295 lawful custody or visitation. 296 (4)âAn individual, including a parent or legal guardian, 297 may not interfere with a parent or legal guardianâs lawful 298 custody or visitation, or cause another person to so interfere, 299 by taking, enticing, inviting, concealing, or withholding a 300 minor or vulnerable adult from a parent or legal guardian, or by 301 taking any other action that keeps a minor or vulnerable adult 302 from a parent or legal guardian. An individual who violates this 303 subsection commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 304 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 305 (5)âA court order obtained for lawful custody or visitation 306 after a violation of this section has occurred does not 307 legitimize the violation. 308 (6)âLaw enforcement officers shall investigate all reported 309 violations of this section. As part of such investigation: 310 (a)âLaw enforcement officers may do all of the following: 311 1.âLocate minors and vulnerable adults. 312 2.âAccompany and assist parents and legal guardians seeking 313 to enforce lawful custody or visitation rights. 314 (b)âLaw enforcement officers may not do any of the 315 following: 316 1.âAdjudicate the merits of custody or visitation disputes. 317 2.âConsider the preferences of a minor or vulnerable adult. 318 3.âDecline to enforce this section on the basis that a 319 civil proceeding is pending. 320 4.âRemove a minor or vulnerable adult from a parent or 321 guardian if doing so would cause physical injury to the minor or 322 vulnerable adult. 323 (7)(a)âUpon concluding an investigation conducted under 324 this section, the law enforcement officer shall do all of the 325 following: 326 1.âImmediately provide the parent or legal guardian who 327 initiated the investigation with written notice of the legal 328 rights and remedies specified in the notice required under s. 329 741.29(1)(d). 330 2.âIf he or she determines that probable cause for arrest 331 does not exist, the officer must prepare a detailed affidavit 332 and promptly submit it to the state attorneyâs office and the 333 officerâs supervisor for review. At a minimum, the affidavit 334 must include all of the following: 335 a.âThe names, ages, genders, and relationships of all minor 336 children and vulnerable adults involved. 337 b.âCopies of any parenting plan, court order, or other 338 agreement determining lawful custody and visitation. 339 c.âCopies of any witness statement obtained during the 340 investigation. 341 d.âA written explanation of his or her basis for 342 determining that probable cause for arrest does not exist. 343 (b)âAll documents related to an investigation under this 344 section must be filed and electronically maintained in 345 accordance with s. 943.1702. 346 (8)âVenue for prosecution of a violation of subsection (4) 347 is the county in which the law, court order, or agreed-upon 348 parenting plan requires the minor or vulnerable adult to reside, 349 be present, or be delivered at the time of the violation, 350 regardless of the actual location of the minor or vulnerable 351 adult. 352 (9)âLaw enforcement officers may enter the identifying 353 information of a minor or vulnerable adult who is the subject of 354 an agreed-upon parenting plan, a court order, or an 355 investigation under this section into state and federal missing 356 child databases and may seek warrants for the recovery of the 357 minor or vulnerable adult consistent with ss. 61.501â61.542. 358 (10)âIt is a defense to a violation of subsection (4) if 359 the defendant establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, 360 that the actions were necessary to protect the minor, vulnerable 361 adult, or himself or herself from imminent harm, provided that 362 the defendant files a complaint with law enforcement in the 363 county in which the minor or vulnerable adult resided at the 364 time of the taking or withholding as soon as is reasonably 365 practicable within 24 hours after the taking or withholding. 366 This defense is barred if a complaint is not filed within 24 367 hours after the taking or withholding. 368 (11)âProof that a person has not attained 18 years of age 369 creates the presumption that the defendant knew the minorâs age 370 or acted in reckless disregard thereof. 371 (12)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall create and 372 distribute a model protocol and training materials to law 373 enforcement agencies for enforcing lawful custody or visitation. 374 Each law enforcement agency shall adopt written policies for 375 responding to interference with lawful custody or visitation and 376 conduct annual training for law enforcement personnel and victim 377 advocates. 378 Section 8.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 379 827.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 380 827.03âAbuse, aggravated abuse, and neglect of a child; 381 penalties.â 382 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 383 (b)ââChild abuseâ means: 384 1.âIntentional infliction of physical or mental injury upon 385 a child; 386 2.âAn intentional act that could reasonably be expected to 387 result in physical or mental injury to a child; or 388 3.âActive encouragement of any person to commit an act that 389 results or could reasonably be expected to result in physical or 390 mental injury to a child; or 391 4.âA violation of s. 787.03, relating to interference with 392 lawful custody or visitation. 393 Section 9.âSection 910.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to 394 read: 395 910.14âKidnapping.âA person who commits an offense provided 396 for in s. 787.01, or s. 787.02, s. 787.03, or s. 787.04 may be 397 tried in any county in which the personâs victim has been taken 398 or confined during the course of the offense. 399 Section 10.âSubsection (3) of section 937.0201, Florida 400 Statutes, is amended to read: 401 937.0201âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 402 (3)ââMissing childâ means a person younger than 18 years of 403 age whose temporary or permanent residence or last known 404 location was is in, or is believed to be in, this state, whose 405 location is unknown to at least one parent or legal guardian 406 with lawful custody or visitation as defined in s. 787.03 has 407 not been determined, and who has been reported as missing to a 408 law enforcement agency. The term includes a person younger than 409 18 years of age who is withheld in violation of a parenting 410 plan, a court order, or applicable law, including through 411 conduct that violates s. 787.01(1)(b) or s. 787.03. 412 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 413 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 414 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 415 61.125, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 416 61.125âParenting coordination.â 417 (4)âDOMESTIC VIOLENCE ISSUES.â 418 (b)âIn determining whether there has been a history of 419 domestic violence, the court shall consider whether a party has 420 committed an act of domestic violence as defined s. 741.28, or 421 child abuse as defined in s. 39.01, against the other party or 422 any member of the other partyâs family; engaged in a pattern of 423 behaviors that exert power and control over the other party and 424 that may compromise the other partyâs ability to negotiate a 425 fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads the other party 426 to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent 427 danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. The court 428 shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, including, but 429 not limited to, the factors listed in s. 741.30(6)(b). 430 Section 12.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 431 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 432 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 433 61.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 434 61.13âSupport of children; parenting and time-sharing; 435 powers of court.â 436 (2) 437 (c)âThe court shall determine all matters relating to 438 parenting and time-sharing of each minor child of the parties in 439 accordance with the best interests of the child and in 440 accordance with the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 441 Enforcement Act, except that modification of a parenting plan 442 and time-sharing schedule requires a showing of a substantial 443 and material change of circumstances. 444 1.âIt is the public policy of this state that each minor 445 child has frequent and continuing contact with both parents 446 after the parents separate or the marriage of the parties is 447 dissolved and to encourage parents to share the rights and 448 responsibilities, and joys, of childrearing. Unless otherwise 449 provided in this section or agreed to by the parties, there is a 450 rebuttable presumption that equal time-sharing of a minor child 451 is in the best interests of the minor child. To rebut this 452 presumption, a party must prove by a preponderance of the 453 evidence that equal time-sharing is not in the best interests of 454 the minor child. Except when a time-sharing schedule is agreed 455 to by the parties and approved by the court, the court must 456 evaluate all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) and make 457 specific written findings of fact when creating or modifying a 458 time-sharing schedule. 459 2.âThe court shall order that the parental responsibility 460 for a minor child be shared by both parents unless the court 461 finds that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental 462 to the child. In determining detriment to the child, the court 463 shall consider: 464 a.âEvidence of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28; 465 b.âWhether either parent has or has had reasonable cause to 466 believe that he or she or his or her minor child or children are 467 or have been in imminent danger of becoming victims of an act of 468 domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 or sexual violence as 469 defined in s. 784.046(1)(c) by the other parent against the 470 parent or against the child or children whom the parents share 471 in common regardless of whether a cause of action has been 472 brought or is currently pending in the court; 473 c.âWhether either parent has or has had reasonable cause to 474 believe that his or her minor child or children are or have been 475 in imminent danger of becoming victims of an act of abuse, 476 abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are defined in s. 39.01, 477 by the other parent against the child or children whom the 478 parents share in common regardless of whether a cause of action 479 has been brought or is currently pending in the court; and 480 d.âAny other relevant factors. 481 3.âThe following evidence creates a rebuttable presumption 482 that shared parental responsibility is detrimental to the child: 483 a.âA parent has been convicted of a misdemeanor of the 484 first degree or higher involving domestic violence, as defined 485 in s. 741.28 and chapter 775; 486 b.âA parent meets the criteria of s. 39.806(1)(d); or 487 c.âA parent has been convicted of or had adjudication 488 withheld for an offense enumerated in s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a., and 489 at the time of the offense: 490 (I)âThe parent was 18 years of age or older. 491 (II)âThe victim was under 18 years of age or the parent 492 believed the victim to be under 18 years of age. 493 494 If the presumption is not rebutted after the convicted parent is 495 advised by the court that the presumption exists, shared 496 parental responsibility, including time-sharing with the child, 497 and decisions made regarding the child, may not be granted to 498 the convicted parent. However, the convicted parent is not 499 relieved of any obligation to provide financial support. If the 500 court determines that shared parental responsibility would be 501 detrimental to the child, it may order sole parental 502 responsibility and make such arrangements for time-sharing as 503 specified in the parenting plan as will best protect the child 504 or abused spouse from further harm. Whether or not there is a 505 conviction of any offense of domestic violence or child abuse or 506 the existence of an injunction for protection against domestic 507 violence, the court shall consider evidence of domestic violence 508 or child abuse as evidence of detriment to the child. 509 4.âIn ordering shared parental responsibility, the court 510 may consider the expressed desires of the parents and may grant 511 to one party the ultimate responsibility over specific aspects 512 of the childâs welfare or may divide those responsibilities 513 between the parties based on the best interests of the child. 514 Areas of responsibility may include education, health care, and 515 any other responsibilities that the court finds unique to a 516 particular family. 517 5.âThe court shall order sole parental responsibility for a 518 minor child to one parent, with or without time-sharing with the 519 other parent if it is in the best interests of the minor child. 520 6.âThere is a rebuttable presumption against granting time 521 sharing with a minor child if a parent has been convicted of or 522 had adjudication withheld for an offense enumerated in s. 523 943.0435(1)(h)1.a., and at the time of the offense: 524 a.âThe parent was 18 years of age or older. 525 b.âThe victim was under 18 years of age or the parent 526 believed the victim to be under 18 years of age. 527 528 A parent may rebut the presumption upon a specific finding in 529 writing by the court that the parent poses no significant risk 530 of harm to the child and that time-sharing is in the best 531 interests of the minor child. If the presumption is rebutted, 532 the court must consider all time-sharing factors in subsection 533 (3) when developing a time-sharing schedule. 534 7.âAccess to records and information pertaining to a minor 535 child, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, and 536 school records, may not be denied to either parent. Full rights 537 under this subparagraph apply to either parent unless a court 538 order specifically revokes these rights, including any 539 restrictions on these rights as provided in a domestic violence 540 injunction. A parent having rights under this subparagraph has 541 the same rights upon request as to form, substance, and manner 542 of access as are available to the other parent of a child, 543 including, without limitation, the right to in-person 544 communication with medical, dental, and education providers. 545 Section 13.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 546 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 547 reference thereto, section 61.401, Florida Statutes, is 548 reenacted to read: 549 61.401âAppointment of guardian ad litem.âIn an action for 550 dissolution of marriage or for the creation, approval, or 551 modification of a parenting plan, if the court finds it is in 552 the best interest of the child, the court may appoint a guardian 553 ad litem to act as next friend of the child, investigator or 554 evaluator, not as attorney or advocate. The court in its 555 discretion may also appoint legal counsel for a child to act as 556 attorney or advocate; however, the guardian and the legal 557 counsel shall not be the same person. In such actions which 558 involve an allegation of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect as 559 defined in s. 39.01, which allegation is verified and determined 560 by the court to be well-founded, the court shall appoint a 561 guardian ad litem for the child. The guardian ad litem shall be 562 a party to any judicial proceeding from the date of the 563 appointment until the date of discharge. 564 Section 14.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 565 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 566 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 61.402, Florida 567 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 568 61.402âQualifications of guardians ad litem.â 569 (3)âOnly a guardian ad litem who qualifies under paragraph 570 (1)(a) or paragraph (1)(c) may be appointed to a case in which 571 the court has determined that there are well-founded allegations 572 of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect as defined in s. 39.01. 573 Section 15.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 574 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 575 reference thereto, subsection (8) of section 95.11, Florida 576 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 577 95.11âLimitations other than for the recovery of real 578 property.âActions other than for recovery of real property shall 579 be commenced as follows: 580 (8)âFOR INTENTIONAL TORTS BASED ON ABUSE.âAn action founded 581 on alleged abuse, as defined in s. 39.01 or s. 415.102; incest, 582 as defined in s. 826.04; or an action brought pursuant to s. 583 787.061 may be commenced at any time within 7 years after the 584 age of majority, or within 4 years after the injured person 585 leaves the dependency of the abuser, or within 4 years from the 586 time of discovery by the injured party of both the injury and 587 the causal relationship between the injury and the abuse, 588 whichever occurs later. 589 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 590 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 591 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 592 390.01114, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 593 390.01114âParental Notice of and Consent for Abortion Act.â 594 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 595 (b)ââChild abuseâ means abandonment, abuse, harm, mental 596 injury, neglect, physical injury, or sexual abuse of a child as 597 those terms are defined in ss. 39.01, 827.04, and 984.03. 598 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 599 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 600 reference thereto, paragraph (g) of subsection (4) of section 601 393.067, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 602 393.067âFacility licensure.â 603 (4)âThe application shall be under oath and shall contain 604 the following: 605 (g)âCertification that the staff of the facility or adult 606 day training program will receive training to detect, report, 607 and prevent sexual abuse, abuse, neglect, exploitation, and 608 abandonment, as defined in ss. 39.01 and 415.102, of residents 609 and clients. 610 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 611 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 612 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 744.309, Florida 613 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 614 744.309âWho may be appointed guardian of a resident ward.â 615 (3)âDISQUALIFIED PERSONS.âNo person who has been convicted 616 of a felony or who, from any incapacity or illness, is incapable 617 of discharging the duties of a guardian, or who is otherwise 618 unsuitable to perform the duties of a guardian, shall be 619 appointed to act as guardian. Further, no person who has been 620 judicially determined to have committed abuse, abandonment, or 621 neglect against a child as defined in s. 39.01 or s. 984.03(1), 622 (2), and (24), or who has been found guilty of, regardless of 623 adjudication, or entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, 624 any offense prohibited under s. 435.04 or similar statute of 625 another jurisdiction, shall be appointed to act as a guardian. 626 Except as provided in subsection (5) or subsection (6), a person 627 who provides substantial services to the proposed ward in a 628 professional or business capacity, or a creditor of the proposed 629 ward, may not be appointed guardian and retain that previous 630 professional or business relationship. A person may not be 631 appointed a guardian if he or she is in the employ of any 632 person, agency, government, or corporation that provides service 633 to the proposed ward in a professional or business capacity, 634 except that a person so employed may be appointed if he or she 635 is the spouse, adult child, parent, or sibling of the proposed 636 ward or the court determines that the potential conflict of 637 interest is insubstantial and that the appointment would clearly 638 be in the proposed wardâs best interest. The court may not 639 appoint a guardian in any other circumstance in which a conflict 640 of interest may occur. 641 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 642 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 643 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 984.03, Florida 644 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 645 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 646 (2)ââAbuseâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01(2). 647 Section 20.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 648 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 649 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 650 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 651 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 652 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 653 powers and perform all duties listed below: 654 (8)âSTUDENT WELFARE.â 655 (c)1.âIn accordance with the rights of parents enumerated 656 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a 657 studentâs parent if there is a change in the studentâs services 658 or monitoring related to the studentâs mental, emotional, or 659 physical health or well-being and the schoolâs ability to 660 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the 661 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of 662 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control 663 of their children by requiring school district personnel to 664 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her 665 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of 666 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit 667 parents from accessing any of their studentâs education and 668 health records created, maintained, or used by the school 669 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2). 670 2.âA school district may not adopt procedures or student 671 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from 672 notifying a parent about his or her studentâs mental, emotional, 673 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related 674 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of 675 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such 676 information. School district personnel may not discourage or 677 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical 678 decisions affecting a studentâs mental, emotional, or physical 679 health or well-being. This subparagraph does not prohibit a 680 school district from adopting procedures that permit school 681 personnel to withhold such information from a parent if a 682 reasonably prudent person would believe that disclosure would 683 result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are 684 defined in s. 39.01. 685 3.âClassroom instruction by school personnel or third 686 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur 687 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss. 688 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in 689 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or 690 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with 691 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools. 692 4.âStudent support services training developed or provided 693 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to 694 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks 695 established by the Department of Education. 696 5.âAt the beginning of the school year, each school 697 district shall notify parents of each health care service 698 offered at their studentâs school and the option to withhold 699 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s. 700 1014.06. Parental consent to a health care service does not 701 waive the parentâs right to access his or her studentâs 702 educational or health records or to be notified about a change 703 in his or her studentâs services or monitoring as provided by 704 this paragraph. 705 6.âBefore administering a student well-being questionnaire 706 or health screening form to a student in kindergarten through 707 grade 3, the school district must provide the questionnaire or 708 health screening form to the parent and obtain the permission of 709 the parent. 710 7.âEach school district shall adopt procedures for a parent 711 to notify the principal, or his or her designee, regarding 712 concerns under this paragraph at his or her studentâs school and 713 the process for resolving those concerns within 7 calendar days 714 after notification by the parent. 715 a.âAt a minimum, the procedures must require that within 30 716 days after notification by the parent that the concern remains 717 unresolved, the school district must either resolve the concern 718 or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the 719 concern. 720 b.âIf a concern is not resolved by the school district, a 721 parent may: 722 (I)âRequest the Commissioner of Education to appoint a 723 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good 724 standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 725 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 726 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or 727 practice, consider information provided by the school district, 728 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State 729 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request 730 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or 731 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled 732 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 733 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The 734 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school 735 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, 736 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph. 737 (II)âBring an action against the school district to obtain 738 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or 739 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A 740 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees 741 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or 742 injunctive relief. 743 c.âEach school district shall adopt and post on its website 744 policies to notify parents of the procedures required under this 745 subparagraph. 746 d.âNothing contained in this subparagraph shall be 747 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in 748 equity already existing under the common law or general law. 749 Section 21.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.